Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB34.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189A.005 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Alcohol concentration" means either grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood
or grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath;
(2) "Cabinet" means the Transportation Cabinet;
(3) "Ignition interlock device" or "device" means a device, certified by the
Transportation Cabinet for use in this Commonwealth under KRS 189A.350, that:
(a) Connects a motor vehicle ignition system or motorcycle ignition system to a
breath alcohol analyzer and prevents a motor vehicle ignition or motorcycle
ignition from starting, and from continuing to operate, if a driver's breath
alcohol concentration exceeds 0.02, as measured by the device; and
(b) Has a fully functional camera that is equipped to record the date, time, and
photo of all persons providing breath samples to the device;
(4) "Ignition interlock certificate of installation" means a certificate providing that the
installed ignition interlock device has been installed and is certified for use in the
Commonwealth under KRS 189A.350;
(5) "Ignition interlock device provider" or "provider" means any person or company
certified by the Transportation Cabinet to engage in the business of manufacturing,
selling, leasing, servicing, or monitoring ignition interlock devices within the
Commonwealth;
(6) "Ignition interlock license" means a motor vehicle or motorcycle operator's license
issued or granted by the laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that, except for
those with an employer exemption under KRS 189A.340, permits a person to drive
only motor vehicles or motorcycles equipped with a functioning ignition interlock
device;
Page 1 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
(7) "License" means any driver's or operator's license or any other license or permit to
operate a motor vehicle issued under or granted by the laws of this state including:
(a) Any temporary license or instruction permit;
(b) The privilege of any person to obtain a valid license or instruction permit, or
to drive a motor vehicle whether or not the person holds a valid license; and
(c) Any nonresident's operating privilege as defined in KRS Chapter 186 or 189;
(8) "Limited access highway" has the same meaning as "limited access facility" does in
KRS 177.220;
(9) "Marijuana concentration" means nanograms of tetrahydrocannabinol per
milliliter of blood;
(10) "Refusal" means declining to submit to any test or tests pursuant to KRS 189A.103.
Declining may be either by word or by the act of refusal. If the breath testing
instrument for any reason shows an insufficient breath sample and the alcohol
concentration cannot be measured by the breath testing instrument, the law
enforcement officer shall then request the defendant to take a blood or urine test in
lieu of the breath test. If the defendant then declines either by word or by the act of
refusal, he or she shall then be deemed to have refused if the refusal occurs at the
site at which any alcohol concentration or substance test is to be administered; and
(11)[(10)] When age is a factor, it shall mean age at the time of the commission of the
offense.
Section 2. KRS 189A.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not operate or be in physical control of a motor vehicle anywhere in
this state:
(a) Having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more as measured by a
scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person's breath or blood
taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle;
Page 2 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
(b) While under the influence of alcohol;
(c) While under the influence of any other substance or combination of
substances which impairs one's driving ability;
(d) While the presence of a controlled substance listed in subsection (12) of this
section is detected in the blood, as measured by a scientifically reliable test, or
tests, taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control
of a motor vehicle;
(e) While under the combined influence of alcohol and any other substance which
impairs one's driving ability; [or]
(f) Having an alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more as measured by a
scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person's breath or blood
taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle, if the person is under the age of twenty-one (21); or
(g) Having a marijuana concentration of 5 or more as measured by a
scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person's blood taken
within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a motor
vehicle.
(2) With the exception of the results of the tests administered pursuant to KRS
189A.103(7):
(a) If the sample of the person's blood or breath that is used to determine the
alcohol concentration thereof was obtained more than two (2) hours after
cessation of operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the results of the
test or tests shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under
subsection (1)(a) or (f) of this section. The results of the test or tests, however,
may be admissible in a prosecution under subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this
section; or
(b) If the sample of the person's blood that is used to determine the presence of a
Page 3 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
controlled substance was obtained more than two (2) hours after cessation of
operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the results of the test or tests
shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of
this section. The results of the test or tests, however, may be admissible in a
prosecution under subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.
(3) (a) In any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section in
which the defendant is charged with having operated or been in physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, the alcohol
concentration in the defendant's blood as determined at the time of making
analysis of his or her blood or breath shall give rise to the following
presumptions:
1.[(a)] If there was an alcohol concentration of less than 0.04 based upon
the definition of alcohol concentration in KRS 189A.005, it shall be
presumed that the defendant was not under the influence of alcohol; and
2.[(b)] If there was an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or greater but less
than 0.08 based upon the definition of alcohol concentration in KRS
189A.005, that fact shall not constitute a presumption that the defendant
either was or was not under the influence of alcohol, but that fact may
be considered, together with other competent evidence, in determining
the guilt or innocence of the defendant.
(b) In any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section
in which the defendant is charged with having operated or been in physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of marijuana, the
marijuana concentration in the defendant's blood as determined at the time
of making analysis of his or her blood shall give rise to the following
presumptions:
1. If there was a marijuana concentration of less than 4 based upon the
Page 4 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
definition of marijuana concentration in Section 1 of this Act, it shall
be presumed that the defendant was not under the influence of
marijuana; and
2. If there was a marijuana concentration of 4 or greater but less than 5
based upon the definition of marijuana concentration in Section 1 of
this Act, that fact shall not constitute a presumption that the defendant
either was or was not under the influence of marijuana, but that fact
may be considered, together with other competent evidence, in
determining the guilt or innocence of the defendant.
The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as limiting the introduction
of any other competent evidence bearing upon the questions of whether the
defendant was under the influence of alcohol, marijuana, or other substances, in
any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b),[ or] (e), or (g) of this section.
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the fact that any person
charged with violation of subsection (1) of this section is legally entitled to
use any substance, including alcohol, shall not constitute a defense against
any charge of violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) A laboratory test or tests for a controlled substance shall be inadmissible as
evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section upon a
finding by the court that the defendant consumed the substance under a valid
prescription from a practitioner, as defined in KRS 218A.010, acting in the
course of his or her professional practice. However, a laboratory test for a
controlled substance may be admissible as evidence in a prosecution under
subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.
(5) Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or (g)
of subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) For the first offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than two
Page 5 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be
imprisoned in the county jail for not less than forty-eight (48) hours nor more
than thirty (30) days, or both. Following sentencing, the defendant may apply
to the judge for permission to enter a community labor program for not less
than forty-eight (48) hours nor more than thirty (30) days in lieu of fine or
imprisonment, or both. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in
subsection (11) of this section are present while the person was operating or in
physical control of a motor vehicle, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be four (4) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(b) For the second offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than
three hundred fifty dollars ($350) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500)
and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than seven (7) days nor
more than six (6) months and, in addition to fine and imprisonment, may be
sentenced to community labor for not less than ten (10) days nor more than
six (6) months. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection
(11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be fourteen (14) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(c) For a third offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than five
hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall
be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days nor more
than twelve (12) months and may, in addition to fine and imprisonment, be
sentenced to community labor for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than
twelve (12) months. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in
Page 6 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be sixty (60) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(d) For a fourth or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period, be guilty of a
Class D felony. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection
(11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be two hundred forty (240) days, which term shall not be
suspended, probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of
release; and
(e) For purposes of this subsection, prior offenses shall include all convictions in
this state, and any other state or jurisdiction, for operating or being in control
of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or other substances
that impair one's driving ability, or any combination of alcohol and such
substances, or while having an unlawful alcohol concentration, or driving
while intoxicated, but shall not include convictions for violating subsection
(1)(f) of this section. A court shall receive as proof of a prior conviction a
copy of that conviction, certified by the court ordering the conviction.
(6) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1)(f) of this section shall be
fined no less than one hundred dollars ($100) and no more than five hundred dollars
($500), or sentenced to twenty (20) hours of community service in lieu of a fine. A
person subject to the penalties of this subsection shall not be subject to the penalties
established in subsection (5) of this section or any other penalty established
pursuant to KRS Chapter 189A, except those established in KRS 189A.040(1) and
KRS 189A.070.
(7) If the person is under the age of twenty-one (21) and there was an alcohol
concentration of 0.08 or greater based on the definition of alcohol concentration in
Page 7 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
KRS 189A.005, the person shall be subject to the penalties established pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section.
(8) For a second or third offense within a ten (10) year period, the minimum sentence
of imprisonment or community labor shall not be suspended, probated, or subject to
conditional discharge or other form of early release. For a fourth or subsequent
offense under this section, the minimum term of imprisonment shall be one hundred
twenty (120) days, and this term shall not be suspended, probated, or subject to
conditional discharge or other form of early release. For a second or subsequent
offense, at least forty-eight (48) hours of the mandatory sentence shall be served
consecutively.
(9) When sentencing persons under subsection (5)(a) of this section, at least one (1) of
the penalties shall be assessed and that penalty shall not be suspended, probated, or
subject to conditional discharge or other form of early release.
(10) In determining the ten (10) year period under this section, the period shall be
measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of
conviction were entered.
(11) For purposes of this section, aggravating circumstances are any one (1) or more of
the following:
(a) Operating a motor vehicle in excess of thirty (30) miles per hour above the
speed limit;
(b) Operating a motor vehicle in the wrong direction on a limited access highway;
(c) Operating a motor vehicle that causes an accident resulting in death or serious
physical injury as defined in KRS 500.080;
(d) Operating a motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the operator's
blood or breath is 0.15 or more as measured by a test or tests of a sample of
the operator's blood or breath taken within two (2) hours of cessation of
operation of the motor vehicle;
Page 8 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
(e) Refusing to submit to any test or tests of one's blood, breath, or urine
requested by an officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person was
operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of subsection
(1) of this section, except it shall not be considered an aggravating
circumstance for a first offense under subsection (5)(a) of this section; and
(f) Operating a motor vehicle that is transporting a passenger under the age of
twelve (12) years old.
(12) The substances applicable to a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section
are:
(a) Any Schedule I controlled substance except marijuana;
(b) Alprazolam;
(c) Amphetamine;
(d) Buprenorphine;
(e) Butalbital;
(f) Carisoprodol;
(g) Cocaine;
(h) Diazepam;
(i) Hydrocodone;
(j) Meprobamate;
(k) Methadone;
(l) Methamphetamine;
(m) Oxycodone;
(n) Promethazine;
(o) Propoxyphene; and
(p) Zolpidem.
Section 3. KRS 189A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All persons convicted of violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or
Page 9 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
(g) shall be sentenced to pay a service fee of four hundred twenty-five dollars
($425), which shall be in addition to all other penalties authorized by law.
(2) The fee shall be imposed in all cases but shall be subject to the provisions of KRS
534.020 and KRS 534.060.
(3) The first fifty dollars ($50) of each service fee imposed by this section shall be paid
into the general fund, the second fifty dollars ($50) of each service fee imposed by
this section shall be paid to the ignition interlock administration fund established in
KRS 189A.380, and the remainder of the revenue collected from the service fee
imposed by this section shall be utilized as follows:
(a) Twelve percent (12%) shall be transferred to the Department of Kentucky
State Police forensic laboratory for the acquisition, maintenance, testing, and
calibration of alcohol concentration testing instruments and the training of
laboratory personnel to perform these tasks;
(b) Twenty percent (20%) shall be allocated to the Department of Public
Advocacy;
(c) One percent (1%) shall be transferred to the Prosecutors Advisory Council for
training of prosecutors for the prosecution of persons charged with violations
of this chapter and for obtaining expert witnesses in cases involving the
prosecution of persons charged with violations of this chapter or any other
offense in which driving under the influence is a factor in the commission of
the offense charged;
(d) Sixteen percent (16%) shall be transferred as follows:
1. Fifty percent (50%) shall be credited to the traumatic brain injury trust
fund established under KRS 211.476; and
2. Fifty percent (50%) shall be credited to the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services, Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and
Intellectual Disabilities, for the purposes of providing direct services to
Page 10 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
individuals with brain injuries that may include long-term supportive
services and training and consultation to professionals working with
individuals with brain injuries. As funding becomes available under this
subparagraph, the cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement the services permitted by
this subparagraph;
(e) Any amount specified by a specific statute shall be transferred as provided in
that statute;
(f) Forty-six percent (46%) shall be transferred to be utilized to fund enforcement
of this chapter and for the support of jails, recordkeeping, treatment, and
educational programs authorized by this chapter and by the Department of
Public Advocacy; and
(g) The remainder shall be transferred to the general fund.
(4) The amounts specified in subsection (3)(a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section shall be
placed in trust and agency accounts that shall not lapse.
Section 4. KRS 189A.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. Unless the person is under eighteen (18) years of age, in addition to the
penalties specified in KRS 189A.010, the Transportation Cabinet shall
suspend a person's license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle
upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1).
2. Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or (g),
the Transportation Cabinet shall suspend a person's license to operate a
motor vehicle or motorcycle as follows:
a. For the first offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 and who meets the ninety (90) consecutive
day requirement within the first four (4) months of the
Page 11 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
issuance of the ignition interlock license, four (4) months;
ii. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the ninety (90)
consecutive day requirement within the first four (4) months
of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until the
person meets the ninety (90) consecutive day requirement or
six (6) months, whichever is shorter; or
iii. For all others, six (6) months;
b. For the second offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 and who meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement within the first twelve (12)
months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license,
twelve (12) months;
ii. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred twenty
(120) consecutive day requirement within the first twelve
(12) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license,
until the person meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement or eighteen (18) months,
whichever is shorter; or
iii. For all others, eighteen (18) months;
c. For a third offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 and who meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement within the first eighteen (18)
months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license,
Page 12 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
eighteen (18) months;
ii. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred twenty
(120) consecutive day requirement within the first eighteen
(18) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license,
until the person meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement or thirty-six (36) months,
whichever is shorter; or
iii. For all others, thirty-six (36) months;
d. For a fourth or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period:
i. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 and who meets the one hundred twenty (120)
consecutive day requirement within the first thirty (30)
months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, thirty
(30) months;
ii. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under
KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred twenty
(120) consecutive day requirement within the first thirty (30)
months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until
the person meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive
day requirement or sixty (60) months, whichever is shorter;
or
iii. For all others, sixty (60) months;
e. If the conviction records transmitted to the Transportation Cabinet
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section show that a person was
convicted of a:
i. First offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's license shall be
Page 13 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
suspended as provided in subdivision a. of this subparagraph;
ii. Second offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's license shall
be suspended as provided in subdivision b. of this
subparagraph;
iii. Third offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's license shall be
suspended as provided in subdivision c. of this subparagraph;
and
iv. Fourth or subsequent offense of KRS 189A.010, the person's
license shall be suspended as provided in subdivision d. of
this subparagraph; and
f. The license suspension shall be deemed effective on the date of
entry of the court's order or judgement for a conviction of KRS
189A.010.
3. Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1)(f), the Transportation Cabinet
shall suspend a person's license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle
as follows:
a. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS
189A.340 and who meets the ninety (90) consecutive day
requirement within the first four (4) months of the issuance of the
ignition interlock license, four (4) months;
b. For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS
189A.340 but does not meet the ninety (90) consecutive day
requirement within the first four (4) months of the issuance of the
ignition interlock license, until the person meets the ninety (90)
consecutive day requirement or six (6) months, whichever is
shorter; or
c. For all others, six (6) months.
Page 14 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
4. For purposes of this paragraph, "ninety (90) consecutive day
requirement" and "one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day
requirement" mean the requirements established in KRS
189A.340(4)(b)2.
(b) For a person under the age of eighteen (18), in addition to the penalties
specified in KRS 189A.010, the Transportation Cabinet shall suspend the
person's license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon conviction of
KRS 189A.010(1). The person shall have his or her license suspended until he
or she reaches the age of eighteen (18) or as provided in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, whichever penalty will result in the longer period of suspension.
(2) In addition to the period of license suspension set forth in subsection (1) of this
section, no person shall be eligible for reinstatement of his or her full privilege to
operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle until he or she has completed the alcohol or
substance abuse education or treatment program ordered pursuant to KRS
189A.040.
(3) Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1):
(a) A person shall surrender his or her license to operate a motor vehicle or
motorcycle to the court. Should the person fail to surrender his or her license
to the court, the court shall issue an order directing the sheriff or any other
peace officer to seize the license forthwith and deliver it to the court. The
court shall then forward the license to the Transportation Cabinet. This
paragraph shall not apply to a person who has previously surrendered his or
her license pursuant to KRS 189A.200; and
(b) The court shall immediately transmit the conviction records and other
appropriate information to the Transportation Cabinet. A court shall not waive
or stay this procedure.
(4) In determining the ten (10) year period under this section, the period shall be
Page 15 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of
conviction were entered.
Section 5. KRS 189A.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall operate or be in physical control of a motor vehicle or motorcycle
while his or her license is suspended under this chapter, unless the person has a
valid:
(a) Ignition interlock license in the person's possession and:
1. The motor vehicle or motorcycle is equipped with a functioning ignition
interlock device; or
2. The person is operating or in physical control of an employer's motor
vehicle or motorcycle in accordance with KRS 189A.340(6); or
(b) Hardship license in the person's possession.
(2) In addition to the period of license suspension imposed by KRS 189A.070, any
person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) For a first offense within a ten (10) year period, be guilty of a Class B
misdemeanor and have his or her license suspended by the Transportation
Cabinet for six (6) months, unless at the time of the offense the person was
also operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or (g), in which event the person shall
be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and have his or her license suspended by
the Transportation Cabinet for a period of one (1) year;
(b) For a second offense within a ten (10) year period, be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor and have his or her license suspended by the Transportation
Cabinet for one (1) year, unless at the time of the offense the person was also
operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or (g), in which event the person shall
be guilty of a Class D felony and have his or her license suspended by the
Page 16 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
Transportation Cabinet for a period of two (2) years; and
(c) For a third or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period, be guilty of a
Class D felony and have his or her license suspended by the Transportation
Cabinet for two (2) years, unless at the time of the offense the person was also
operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or (g), in which event the person shall
be guilty of a Class D felony and have his or her license suspended by the
Transportation Cabinet for a period of five (5) years.
(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section may apply for an ignition
interlock license for the remainder of the original period of suspension under KRS
189A.070 and for the entire period of the new suspension if the person is and
remains otherwise eligible for such license pursuant to KRS 189A.340.
(4) The ten (10) year period under this section shall be measured in the same manner as
in KRS 189A.070.
Section 6. KRS 189A.240 is amended to read as follows:
In any judicial review of a pretrial suspension imposed under KRS 189A.200(1)(b), if the
court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) The person was charged and arrested by a peace officer with a violation of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or (g);
(2) The peace officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating a
motor vehicle in violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or (g);
(3) There is probable cause to believe that the person committed the violation of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or (g) as charged; and
(4) The person has been convicted of one (1) or more prior offenses as described in
KRS 189A.010(5)(e) or has had his or her motor vehicle operator's license
suspended on one (1) or more occasions for refusing to take an alcohol
concentration or substance test, in the ten (10) year period immediately preceding
Page 17 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
his or her arrest;
then the court shall continue to suspend the person's operator's license or privilege to
operate a motor vehicle, but in no event for a period longer than the license suspension
period applicable to the person under KRS 189A.070 and 189A.107. The provisions of
this section shall not be construed as limiting the person's ability to challenge any prior
convictions or license suspensions or refusals.
Section 7. KRS 189A.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At any time during the suspension periods enumerated in:
(a) KRS 189A.070 for violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(c),[ or] (d), or (g); or
(b) KRS 189A.090 relating to a violation of KRS 189A.010(1) (c),[ or] (d), or
(g);
the court may grant the person hardship driving privileges for the balance of the
suspension period imposed by the Transportation Cabinet, if the court finds
reasonable cause to believe that revocation would hinder the person's ability to
continue his or her employment; continue attending school or an educational
institution; obtain necessary medical care; attend driver improvement, alcohol, or
substance abuse education programs; or attend court-ordered counseling or other
programs.
(2) Before granting hardship driving privileges, the court shall order the person to:
(a) Provide the court with proof of motor vehicle insurance;
(b) If necessary, provide the court with a written, sworn statement from his or her
employer, on a form provided by the cabinet, detailing his or her job, hours of
employment, and the necessity for the person to use the employer's motor
vehicle either in his or her work at the direction of the employer during
working hours, or in travel to and from work if the license is sought for
employment purposes; and
(c) If the person is self-employed, to provide the information required in
Page 18 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
paragraph (b) of this subsection together with a sworn statement as to its truth;
(d) Provide the court with a written, sworn statement from the school or
educational institution which he or she attends, of his or her class schedule,
courses being undertaken, and the necessity for the person to use a motor
vehicle in his or her travel to and from school or other educational institution
if the license is sought for educational purposes. Licenses for educational
purposes shall not include participation in sports, social, extracurricular,
fraternal, or other noneducational activities;
(e) Provide the court with a written, sworn statement from a physician, or other
medical professional licensed but not certified under the laws of Kentucky,
attesting to the person's normal hours of treatment, and the necessity to use a
motor vehicle to travel to and from the treatment if the license is sought for
medical purposes;
(f) Provide the court with a written, sworn statement from the director of any
alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program as to the hours in
which the person is expected to participate in the program, the nature of the
program, and the necessity for the person to use a motor vehicle to travel to
and from the program if the license is sought for alcohol or substance abuse
education or treatment purposes;
(g) Provide the court with a copy of any court order relating to treatment,
participation in driver improvement programs, or other terms and conditions
ordered by the court relating to the person which require him or her to use a
motor vehicle in traveling to and from the court-ordered program. The judge
shall include in the order the necessity for the use of the motor vehicle; and
(h) Provide to the court any information as may be required by administrative
regulation of the Transportation Cabinet.
(3) The court shall not issue a hardship license to a person who has refused to take an
Page 19 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
alcohol concentration or substance test or tests offered by a law enforcement
officer.
Section 8. KRS 189A.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) If a person's license is suspended pursuant to this chapter and the initial
suspension was for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (e), or (f), the sole
license the person shall be eligible for is an ignition interlock license pursuant
to this section.
(b) If a person's license is suspended pursuant to this chapter and the initial
suspension was for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(c),[ or] (d), or (g), the
person shall be eligible for an ignition interlock license pursuant to this
section and may be eligible for a hardship license pursuant to KRS 189A.410.
(2) (a) A person may apply for an ignition interlock license anytime, including after
receiving the notices under KRS 189A.105 or after his or her license has been
suspended pursuant to this chapter.
(b) If at the time the person applies for an ignition interlock license, the person's
license has been suspended pursuant to this chapter, the person shall be
authorized to drive to:
1. An ignition interlock device provider to have a functioning ignition
interlock device installed in his or her motor vehicle or motorcycle; and
2. The Transportation Cabinet to obtain an ignition interlock license;
This paragraph shall only apply within fourteen (14) days of the date printed
on the ignition interlock approval letter issued by the Transportation Cabinet
and if the person has the ignition interlock approval letter in the motor vehicle
or motorcycle.
(3) Before the Transportation Cabinet shall issue an ignition interlock license, the
person shall:
(a) Submit an application for an ignition interlock license;
Page 20 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
(b) Provide proof of motor vehicle insurance;
(c) Provide an ignition interlock certificate of installation issued by an ignition
interlock device provider; and
(d) Provide any other information required by administrative regulations
promulgated by the Transportation Cabinet under KRS 189A.350.
(4) An ignition interlock license shall restrict the person to operating only a motor
vehicle or motorcycle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device, unless
the person qualifies for an employer exemption under subsection (6) of this section.
This restriction shall remain in place for:
(a) If a person's license was suspended pretrial pursuant to KRS 189A.200, the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.200(6);
(b) If a person's license was suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.070 or 189A.107:
1. The required suspension period under KRS 189A.070(1); and
2. a. If the maximum suspension period under KRS 189A.070(1)(a) has
not yet been met, until the Transportation Cabinet has received a
declaration from the person's ignition interlock device provider, in
a form provided or approved by the cabinet, certifying that none of
the violations outlined in subdivision b. of this subparagraph has
occurred:
i. For a first offense within a ten (10) year period of KRS
189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or (g) or for any
offense of KRS 189A.010(1)(f), in the ninety (90)
consecutive days; and
ii. For all subsequent offenses within a ten (10) year period of
KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d),[ or] (e), or (g), one
hundred twenty (120) consecutive days;
prior to the date of releasing the ignition interlock device
Page 21 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
restriction.
b. If any of the following occur, it shall be a violation of the ninety
(90) or one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement:
i. Failure to take any random breath alcohol concentration test
unless a review of the digital image confirms that the motor
vehicle or motorcycle was not occupied by a driver at the
time of the missed test;
ii. Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol
concentration of 0.02 or lower unless a subsequent test
performed within ten (10) minutes registers a breath alcohol
concentration lower than 0.02, and the digital image
confirms the same person provided both samples;
iii. Failure of the person, or his or her designee, to appear at the
ignition interlock device provider when required for
maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or
replacement of the device;
iv. Failure of the person to pay fees established pursuant to
subsection (7) of this section;
v. Tampering with an installed ignition interlock device with
the intent of rendering it defective; or
vi. Altering, concealing, hiding, or attempting to alter, conceal,
or hide, the person's identity from the ignition interlock
device's camera while providing a breath sample;
(c) If a person's license was suspended pursuant to KRS 189A.090, for the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.090(2); or
(d) If a person's license suspension was extended pursuant to KRS 189A.345, the
required suspension period under KRS 189A.345(1).
Page 22 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
(5) (a) The time period a person:
1. Holds a valid ignition interlock license pursuant to this section; or
2. Receives alcohol or substance abuse treatment in an inpatient residential
facility;
shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the suspension periods
detailed in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the Transportation
Cabinet shall give the person a day-for-day credit for any time period the
person:
1. Held a valid ignition interlock license; or
2. Received alcohol or substance abuse treatment in an inpatient residential
facility.
(c) A person shall not receive day-for-day credit for days the person utilized the
employer exemption in accordance with subsection (6) of this section and
drove an employer's motor vehicle or motorcycle not equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock device.
(6) (a) A person with an ignition interlock license may operate a motor vehicle or
motorcycle not equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device if:
1. The person is required to operate an employer's motor vehicle or
motorcycle in the course and scope of employment; and
2. The business entity that owns the motor vehicle or motorcycle is not
owned or controlled by the person.
(b) To qualify for the employer exemption, the person shall provide the
Transportation Cabinet with a sworn statement from his or her employer
stating that the person and business entity meet the requirements of paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(7) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, an ignition interlock
Page 23 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
device provider may charge the following fees:
1. An installation fee for an alternative fuel vehicle or a vehicle with a
push button starter not to exceed one hundred thirty dollars ($130), an
installation fee for all other vehicles not to exceed one hundred dollars
($100);
2. A monthly fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100);
3. A removal fee not to exceed thirty dollars ($30);
4. A reset fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50); or
5. A missed appointment fee not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35).
(b) A person who is issued an ignition interlock license shall pay fees as
established in his or her lease agreement with the ignition interlock device
provider for any ignition interlock device installed in his or her motor vehicle
or motorcycle. However, the fees shall never be more than allowed under
paragraph (a) of this subsection and are subject to paragraph (c) of this
subsection.
(c) Any person who has an income:
1. At or below two hundred percent (200%) but above one hundred fifty
percent (150%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only
seventy-five percent (75%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a)
of this subsection;
2. At or below one hundred fifty percent (150%) but above one hundred
percent (100%) of the federal poverty guidelines, shall pay only fifty
percent (50%) of fees established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection; or
3. At or below one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty
guidelines, shall pay only twenty-five percent (25%) of fees established
pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection;
Page 24 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 884
As used in this paragraph, "federal poverty guidelines" has the same meaning
as in KRS 205.5621. The Transportation Cabinet shall determine the person's
income and where that income places the person on the federal poverty
guidelines.
(d) Neither the Commonwealth, the Transportation Cabinet, nor any unit of state
or local government shall be responsible for payment of any costs associated
with an ignition interlock device.
(8) For a person issued an ignition interlock license under this section who is residing
outside of Kentucky, the Transportation Cabinet may accept an ignition interlock
certificate of installation from an ignition interlock device provider authorized to do
business in the state where the person resides if the ignition interlock device meets
the requirements of that state.
Page 25 of 25
XXXX 12/13/2024 4:22 PM Jacketed